Maine, session 132, LD1253.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 12 MRSA §6171, sub-§3, as corrected by RR 2021, c. 2, Pt. B, §35, is
amended to read:
3. Emergency rules. The commissioner may adopt or amend rules under the
emergency procedures provided in Title 5, chapter 375 in the following circumstances:
A. Immediate action is necessary to protect or conserve any marine organism from
unusual damage or imminent depletion;
B. An unusually large concentration of persons who fish might deplete the supply of
any marine organism;
C. Immediate action is necessary to comply with changes to federal or interstate
fisheries management plans; or
D. Immediate action is necessary pursuant to section 6302‑B, subsection 4 to prohibit
elver fishing.; or
E. Immediate action is necessary to add up to a total of 5 limited-access area days
during the scallop season under section 6722 if the commissioner determines that
additional days are necessary to counteract the inability to fish for or take scallops on
certain days due to inclement weather and that the scallop population is sufficient to
allow additional fishing for or taking of scallops in those limited-access areas.
Page 1 - 132LR0995(03)